Massachusetts, session 194th, H471.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 289 the following section, titled “Fireproofing Applicators; License Requirement”:-
Section 290. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the meaning
ascribed as follows:
(1) "Fire-resistant material" means cementitious or fibrous materials that are sprayed onto
a surface to provide fire-resistant protection of the substrate.
(2) "Fire-resistant material applicator" means an individual who applies fire resistant
materials.
(b) Requirements.
of 3

(1) Every fire-resistant material applicator shall undergo training to apply fire-resistant
materials according to manufacturer specifications.
(2) Every fire-resistant material applicator shall annually register with the board of
examiners of fireproofing applicators.
(3) When a fire-resistant material applicator satisfactorily completes training and registers
as required by this subsection, the state board of examiners of fireproofing applicators shall issue
a license that indicates that the fire-resistant material applicator is qualified to apply fire-resistant
material.
(c) Violations. Any person applying fire-resistant material who does not receive the
training, register, and obtain a license as required in subsection (b) of this section shall be fined
up to two hundred-fifty dollars per violation.
SECTION 2. Chapter 13 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 109 the following section, titled “Board of Examiners of Fireproofing Applicators”:-
Section 110. (a) There shall be within the division of occupational licensure a board of
examiners of fireproofing applicators to consist of 7 voting members; 2 of whom will be
designees of the commissioner of the division of occupational licensure and 5 persons, residents
of the commonwealth, to be appointed by the governor for terms of 3 years, 2 of whom shall be
fireproof applicators with at least 10 years of practical experience and who are wage earners, 2 of
whom shall be fireproof applicators with at least 10 years of practical experience and 1 of whom
shall be a representative of the public and subject to section 9B.
of 3

(b) No member shall serve for more than 2 consecutive and complete 3-year terms. As
the term of the office of a member expires, a successor shall be appointed in like manner for a
term of 3 years. The governor may fill a vacancy in the board for the unexpired portion of the
term.
(c) The board shall annually elect from among its members a chairperson and vice-
chairperson. The board shall meet at least 4 times annually and may hold additional meetings as
necessary to discharge its duties. Members shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled
to reasonable travel expenses. The members of the board shall be public employees for the
purposes of chapter 258 for all acts or omissions within the scope of their duties as board
members.
(d) The board shall have the following powers and duties: (i) to administer and enforce
section 290 of chapter 112; (ii) to adopt rules and regulations governing the licensure of fireproof
applicators, and business entities and schools teaching fireproof applicators; (iii) to establish
standards of professional and ethical conduct; (iv) to establish standards for continuing education
reflecting acceptable national standards; and (v) in conjunction with the division of occupational
licensure, to investigate complaints, conduct inspections, request and review business records of
licensees, and set and administer penalties as defined in sections 61 to 65E, inclusive, of said
chapter 112 and section 290 of chapter 112 for fraudulent, deceptive or professionally
incompetent and unsafe practices and for violations of rules and regulations promulgated by the
board.
of 3